bg-BG: Механизъм на комутатора: Капацитивен; Ефект на Хол; Пластинчат превключвател; Магнитна; Механичен; Микропревключвател; Оптично; Пиезо; Гумен купол; Други
nl: Schakelmechanisme: Capacitief; Hall-effect; Bladschakelaar; Magnetisch; Mechanisch; Microschakelaar; Optisch; Piezo; Rubberen koepel; Andere
tr: Anahtar mekanizması: Kapasitif; Hall etkisi; Yaprak anahtar; Manyetik; Mekanik; Mikro anahtar; Optik; Piezo; Kauçuk kubbe; Diğer
lt-LT: Jungiklio mechanizmas: Talpinis; Hall efektas; Lapelinis jungiklis; Magnetinis; Mechaninis; Mikrojungiklis; Optinis; „Piezo“; Guminis kupolas; Kita
zh-CN: 开关机制: 电容式; 霍尔效应; 簧片开关; 磁力; 机械刀片; 微动开关; 光学; 压电拾音器; 橡胶圆顶; 其他
fr: Mécanisme de commutation: Capacitif; Effet Hall; Interrupteur à lame; Magnétique; Mécanique; Microrupteur; Optique; Piezo; Dôme en caoutchouc; Autre
th: กลไกสวิตช์: คาปาซิทีฟ; Hall effect; สวิตช์แผ่นโลหะ; แม่เหล็ก; แบบกลไก; ไมโครสวิตช์; ออปติคัล; เพียโซ; ยางโดม; อื่นๆ
ko: 스위치 메커니즘: 정전식; 홀 이펙트; 리프 스위치; 자기식; 기계식; 마이크로스위치; 광학; Piezo; 러버돔; 기타
it: Meccanismo dell'interruttore: Capacitivo; Effetto Hall; Interruttore a lamella; Magnetico; Meccanico; Microinterruttore; Ottico; Piezo; Cupola in gomma; Altro
ru: Механизм переключателя: Емкостный; Эффект Холла; Листовой переключатель; Магнитный; Механический; Микропереключатель; Оптический; Пьезо; Резиновый купол; Другой
nb: Brytermekanisme: Kapasitiv; Hall-effekt; Bladbryter; Magnetisk; Mekanisk; Mikrobryter; Optisk; Piezo; Gummikuppel; Annet
pt-BR: Mecanismo do interruptor: Capacitivo; Efeito Hall; Chave de lâmina; Magnética; Mecânica; Microchave; Óptica; Piezoeletricidade; Domo de borracha; Outro
de: Schaltmechanismus: Kapazitiv; Hall-Effekt; Federschalter; Magnetisch; Mechanisch; Mikroschalter; Optisch; Piezo; Gummikuppel; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Mehanizem stikala: Kapacitivna; Hall efekt; Listnato stikalo; Magnetno; Mehansko; Mikro stikalo; Optično; Piezo; Gumijasta kupola; Drugo
fi: Kytkentämekanismi: Kapasitiivinen; Hall-ilmiö; Lehtikytkin; Magneettinen; Mekaaninen; Mikrokytkin; Optinen; Pietso; Kumikupoli; Muu
ro-RO: Mecanismul comutatorului: Capacitivă; Efect Hall; Comutator cu lamă; Magnetic; Mecanică; Microîntrerupător; Optic; Piezo; Cupolă de cauciuc; Altele
pt-PT: Mecanismo do interruptor: Capacitivo; Efeito Hall; Interruptor de lâmina; Magnético; Mecânico; Microinterruptor; Ótico; Piezo; Cúpula de borracha; Outro
ja: スイッチメカニズム: 静電容量式; ホール効果; リーフスイッチ; 磁気; メカニカル; マイクロスイッチ; 光学式; ピエゾ; ラバードーム; その他
en: Switch mechanism: Capacitive; Hall effect; Leaf switch; Magnetic; Mechanical; Microswitch; Optical; Piezo; Rubber dome; Other
sk-SK: Mechanizmus spínača: Kapacitný; Hallov efekt; Listový spínač; Magnetický; Mechanický; Mikrospínač; Optický; Piezo; Gumová kupola; Iné
pl: Mechanizm przełącznika: Pojemnościowy; Hall effect; Przełącznik listkowy; Magnetyczny; Mechaniczne; Mikroprzełącznik; Optyczne; Piezo; Kopułka gumowa; Inne
hu: Kapcsolómechanizmus: Kapacitív; Hall-effektus; Rugólapos kapcsoló; Mágneses; Mechanikus; Mikrokapcsoló; Optikai; Piezo; Gumikupola; Egyéb
vi: Cơ chế công tắc: Điện dung; Hiệu ứng Hall; Công tắc lá; Từ tính; Cơ; Công tắc siêu nhỏ; Quang học; Áp điện; Vòm cao su; Khác
hr-HR: Mehanizam prekidača: Kapacitivno; Hallov efekt; Listićasti prekidač; Magnet; Mehanički; Mikroprekidač; Optički; Piezo; Gumena kupola; Ostalo
el: Μηχανισμός διακόπτη: Χωρητική; Hall effect; Διακόπτης ελάσματος; Μαγνητικό; Μηχανικό; Μικροδιακόπτης; Οπτικό καλώδιο; Piezo; Ελαστικός θόλος; Άλλο
sv: Omkopplarmekanism: Kapacitiv; Hall-effekt; Bladbrytare; Magnetisk; Mekaniskt; Mikrobrytare; Optisk; Piezo; Gummikupol; Övrigt
es: Mecanismo del interruptor: Capacitivo; Efecto Hall; Interruptor de lámina; Magnético; Mecánico; Microinterruptor; Óptico; Piezo; Domo de goma; Otros
da: Kontaktmekanisme: Kapacitiv; Hall-effekt; Bladkontakt; Magnetisk; Mekanisk; Mikrokontakt; Optisk; Piezo; Gummikuppel; Andet
zh-TW: 開關機制: 電容式; 霍爾效應; 葉片開關; 磁性; 機械; 微動開關; 光學; 接觸式; 橡膠圓頂; 其他
cs: Mechanismus spínače: Kapacitní; Hallův jev; Pérový spínač; Magnetická; Mechanický; Mikrospínač; Optická; Piezo; Gumový dóm; Jiné